Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1653
District; dissolution; petition; hearing; notice; resolution of county board; funds; disposition.

(1) A petition for dissolution of a district may be filed:

(a) By persons that own not less than twenty-five percent of the territory of the district; and

(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in such district.

(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the county clerk.

(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the board shall set a time and place for a hearing pursuant to sections 39-1641 and 39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a resolution dissolving the district.

(4) If a district is dissolved pursuant to this section, the board shall perform all acts necessary to wind up the affairs of the district. All funds remaining after discharge of the district's indebtedness shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 16, p. 686;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 65.
July 18, 2026